Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 16 State Officers
25-16-716. Fee reimbursement.

The Office of the Attorney General may charge a fee to a governmental unit to reimburse the office for an expenditure made on behalf of a governmental unit.

A fee under subsection (a) of this section shall be deposited by the office into the State Central Services Fund as a refund to an expenditure.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 897, § 19.

Subchapter 8

— Members of Boards and Commissions

25-16-801. Appointments from congressional districts.

(1)Whenever any laws of this state shall provide for the appointment of members of boards and commissions from each congressional district, they shall be deemed to mean the congressional districts of the state existing at the time of the appointment, and not the congressional districts existing at the time of the passage of those laws.

Whenever the total membership of any board or commission shall exceed the number of congressional districts from which appointments are to be made, the members in excess of congressional district appointees shall be appointed from the state at large.

If the number of congressional districts in this state shall be reduced to fewer than six (6), the members of all boards and commissions of this state, including the Legislative Council and the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, who are selected or apportioned on the basis of congressional districts, shall continue to be selected or apportioned upon the basis of the six (6) congressional districts, as established by Act 297 of 1951 [repealed], until otherwise specifically provided by law.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 235, § 2; 1969, No. 465, Art. 4, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-406.

25-16-802. [Repealed.]

The terms of office of members of boards and commissions of this state which by law expire between the date of the biennial general election and the date of the swearing in of the Governor elected at the election shall be extended until the date of the swearing in of the Governor. However, this section shall have no effect upon the filling of vacancies otherwise occurring during that time period.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 225, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-627.

25-16-804. Removal and replacement.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Good cause” includes:

Conduct constituting a criminal offense involving moral turpitude;

Gross dereliction of duty;

Gross abuse of authority; or

The unexcused absence of a board or commission member from three (3) successive regular meetings without attending any intermediary called special meetings; and

“Good cause” does not include any vote, decision, opinion, or other regularly performed or otherwise reasonably exercised power of a board or commission member.

The Governor may remove for good cause a state board or commission member whose office or position is filled by gubernatorial appointment, subject to confirmation by the Senate. If the Senate is not in session, confirmation shall be by written petition of a majority of the senators.

The Governor may appoint a qualified individual to replace the board or commission member removed to serve the remainder of his or her term, subject to confirmation by the Senate under circumstances in which confirmation is normally required.

All orders of removal by the Governor shall:

Be in writing;

Be delivered to the member removed or counsel for the member; and

Specifically set out the grounds relied upon for removal.

Removal of board or commission members shall be in accordance with the following:

Within thirty (30) calendar days after each regular board or commission meeting, the secretary of each board or commission shall notify the Governor in writing of any member who has been absent from three (3) successive regular meetings without attending any intermediary called special meetings.

The secretary's notice to the Governor shall include a copy of all meeting notices and attendance records for the past year;

The Governor may remove any board or commission secretary who fails to submit the notices and documentation required by this section;

Within sixty (60) calendar days after receiving the notice and supporting documentation from the board or commission secretary, the Governor shall notify the board or commission member in writing of his or her intent to remove the member for cause;

Within twenty (20) calendar days after the date of the Governor's notice, the member may request an excused absence as provided by this section or may file notice with the Governor's office that the member disputes the attendance records and the reasons therefor;

The Governor shall grant an excuse for illness of the member when the illness is verified by a written sworn statement by an attending physician or another proper excuse as determined by the Governor; and

After twenty (20) calendar days after the date of the Governor's notice, if no rebuttal is received or other adequate documentation is submitted, the member may be removed.

Any board or commission member referred to the Governor because of excessive absences under the provision of this section shall not be entitled to any per diem, stipend, or expense reimbursement for travel to or attendance at subsequent meetings until the board or commission receives notification from the Governor that the member has been excused for the absences.

A removed board or commission member may institute proceedings for review by filing a petition in Pulaski County Circuit Court within thirty (30) days after delivery to him or her or his or her attorney of the Governor's order of removal.

This petition shall not supersede or stay the order of removal, nor shall any court enter an order to this effect or one which would impair the authority of the Governor to appoint a replacement whose service begins immediately upon fulfillment of the normal requirements for assuming office.

When the matter is heard by the Pulaski County Circuit Court, it shall be tried de novo without a jury.

The Governor shall have the burden of proof to show by clear and convincing evidence that good cause existed for removal of the board or commission member in question from office and for revoking his or her commission.

If the court determines that good cause has been shown, it shall enter an order removing the board or commission member in question from office and revoking his or her commission.

If the court determines that good cause has not been shown by clear and convincing evidence, the court shall order the removed member reinstated to his or her position and upon request shall award a reasonable attorney's fee and court costs to the reinstated party.

Subject to the restrictions of subsection (f) of this section on supersedeas or stay orders, a removed board or commission member may appeal the decision of the circuit court to the Supreme Court.

The Governor may appeal the decision of the circuit court to the Supreme Court, but the appeal shall not preclude the circuit court, in its discretion, from entering an order reinstating the removed member.

No board or commission action in which the appointed replacement participates shall be void, voidable, or in any way subject to invalidation on grounds of participation of the appointed replacement or lack of participation by the removed member in the event that the circuit court or the Supreme Court orders the removed member reinstated.

“Good cause” includes:

Conduct constituting a criminal offense involving moral turpitude;

Gross dereliction of duty;

Gross abuse of authority; or

The unexcused absence of an agency, board, or commission member from three (3) successive regular meetings without attending any intermediary called special meetings; and

“Good cause” does not include any vote, decision, opinion, or other regularly performed or otherwise reasonably exercised power of a member.

Specifically set out the grounds relied upon for removal.

The secretary's notice to the Governor shall include a copy of all meeting notices and attendance records for the past year;

The Governor may remove any agency, board, or commission secretary who fails to submit the notices and documentation required by this section;

Within sixty (60) calendar days after receiving the notice and supporting documentation from the agency, board, or commission secretary, the Governor shall notify the member in writing of his or her intent to remove the member for cause;

Within twenty (20) calendar days after the issue date of the Governor's notice, the member may request an excused absence as provided by this section or may file notice with the Governor's office that the member disputes the attendance records and the reasons;

The Governor shall grant an excuse for illness of the member when the illness is verified by a written sworn statement by an attending physician or another proper excuse as determined by the Governor; and

After twenty (20) calendar days from the issue date of the Governor's notice, if no rebuttal is received or other adequate documentation is submitted, the member may be removed.

If the court determines that good cause has not been shown by clear and convincing evidence, the court shall order the removed member reinstated to his or her position and upon request shall award a reasonable attorney's fee and court costs to the reinstated party.

Cross References. Rural Medical Practice Student Loan and Scholarship Board, §6-81-702.

Effective Dates. Acts 1995, No. 1211, § 11: Apr. 11, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a more uniform system of expense reimbursement and stipend authorization for the various state boards should be implemented as soon as possible; this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to provide for its implementation as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 966, § 17: Mar. 31, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the statutes regulating the licensure of podiatrists are outdated in part and that the passage of the act before June of 1997 is required in order to guarantee that these laws will apply to persons taking the podiatric medical examination in June. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1018, § 8: Apr. 2, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas Code25-16-903 authorized members of the Advisory Committee on Petroleum Storage Tanks and members of the State Marketing Board of Recyclables to receive a stipend for attending board meetings; that Arkansas Code8-7-904 and8-9-201 were enacted prior to Arkansas Code25-16-903 and do not mention stipends; that the earlier code sections should be amended to parallel the authority granted in § 25-16-903; that this act makes those technical corrections; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to avoid confusion. It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that the current law concerning expense reimbursement for the State Board of Collection Agencies does not conform to Arkansas Code25-16-901 et seq.; the State Board of Collection Agencies should be allowed to receive a stipend; and that this act is immediately necessary for the effective operation of the State Board of Collection Agencies. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1353, § 20: Sept. 1, 1999, except for sections 15 and 17 of the act which are effective July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the need to register sex or child offenders or sexually violent predators is necessary to ensure the safety of the citizens of Arkansas. Currently, some sex or child offenders or sexually violent predators do not fall within the provisions of the current law and are therefore not required to be registered. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on September 1, 1999. Section 15 and Section 17 of this act shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1553, § 23: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that regular examinations for licensure under the Arkansas Chiropractic Practices Act are held in January and July; that brochures containing Arkansas law must be prepared for applicants; that for the effective administration of the Arkansas Chiropractic Practices Act, this act should become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 261, § 8: July 1, 2009: Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2009 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2009 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 129: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the membership and duties of certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commissions and repeals other governmental entities; that these revisions and repeals of governmental entities impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the provisions of this act should become effective as soon as possible to allow for implementation of the new provisions in advance of the upcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 788, § 2: July 1, 2018.

Acts 2017, No. 824, § 19: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Student Loan Authority may be more efficiently structured; that restructuring will result in cost savings to the taxpayers of the State; and that this act is necessary because the Arkansas Development Finance Authority is well positioned to supervise the administration of a Student Loan Authority Division. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

(1)Subject to the restrictions of subsection (f) of this section on supersedeas or stay orders, a removed agency, board, or commission member may appeal the decision of the circuit court to the Supreme Court.

An agency, board, or commission action in which the appointed replacement participates shall not be void, voidable, or in any way subject to invalidation on grounds of participation of the appointed replacement or lack of participation by the removed member in the event that the circuit court or the Supreme Court orders the removed member reinstated.

For purposes of this subchapter, the term “state board” means every state board, commission, committee, council, task force, and similar entity except the General Assembly, the State Highway Commission, and the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission.

This subchapter shall have no effect on the payment of mileage, expense reimbursement, and per diem authorized by law to be paid to members of the General Assembly, the State Highway Commission, and the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission.

Every state board may, by a majority vote of the total membership of the board cast during its first regularly scheduled meeting of each calendar year, authorize expense reimbursement for each board member for performing official board duties.

The expense reimbursement shall not exceed the rate established for state employees by state travel regulations.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 160, §§ 1-7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-300.1 — 12-300.7; Acts 2001, No. 453, § 1.

25-16-805. Special board members.

When any member of a state commission, board, council, committee, or similar body is disqualified or is otherwise temporarily unable or unwilling to serve in regard to any matter or matters pending before the entity, the Governor or other appointing authority may appoint a qualified person to serve as a special member of the entity to hear and participate in the decision on the particular matter or matters.

The special board member appointed under this section shall have all authority and responsibility of a regular board member with respect to the particular matter or matters before the entity but shall have no authority or responsibility with respect to any other matter or matters before the board.

The chair of the entity requesting a special board member shall inform the Governor or other appointing authority of the request in writing no later than twenty-four (24) hours prior to the meeting in which the special board member shall serve.

A person appointed as a special member of a state commission, board, council, committee, or similar body pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be entitled to receive stipends and expense reimbursement in the same amount and under the same procedure as prescribed for regular members. The stipends and expense reimbursement shall be paid from the same source as stipends and expense reimbursement payment to regular members.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1251, §§ 1-4; 1997, No. 250, § 238.

25-16-806. Removal and replacement of positions without confirmation.

As used in this section:

(1)The Governor may remove for good cause an agency, board, or commission member whose office or position is filled by gubernatorial appointment that is not subject to confirmation by the Senate or a majority of senators.

The Governor may appoint a qualified individual to replace the removed member to serve the remainder of the removed member's term.

All orders of removal by the Governor shall:

Be in writing;

Be delivered to the removed member or counsel for the member; and

Removal of an agency, board, or commission member shall be in accordance with the following:

(A)Within thirty (30) calendar days after each regular agency, board, or commission meeting, the secretary of the agency, board, or commission shall notify the Governor in writing of any member who has been absent from three (3) successive regular meetings without attending any intermediary called special meetings.

An agency, board, or commission member referred to the Governor because of excessive absences under the provisions of this section shall not be entitled to any per diem, stipend, or expense reimbursement for travel to or attendance at subsequent meetings until the agency, board, or commission receives notification from the Governor that the member has been excused for the absences.

(1)A removed member may institute proceedings for review by filing a petition in Pulaski County Circuit Court within thirty (30) days after delivery to him or her or his or her attorney of the Governor's order of removal.

This petition shall not supersede or stay the order of removal, nor shall any court enter an order to this effect or one which would impair the authority of the Governor to appoint a replacement whose service begins immediately upon fulfillment of the normal requirements for assuming office.

(1)When the matter is heard by the Pulaski County Circuit Court, the matter shall be tried de novo without a jury.

The Governor shall have the burden of proof to show by clear and convincing evidence that good cause existed for removal of the agency, board, or commission member in question from office and for revoking his or her commission.

(A)If the court determines that good cause has been shown, it shall enter an order removing the member in question from office and revoking his or her commission.

The Governor may appeal the decision of the circuit court to the Supreme Court, but the appeal shall not preclude the circuit court, in its discretion, from entering an order reinstating the removed member.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1277, § 1.

Subchapter 9

— State Boards — Compensation

25-16-901. Definitions — Limitations.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1211, § 1.

25-16-902. Expense reimbursement.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1211, § 2.

25-16-903. Stipend — Authorization for $60.

Each of the following state boards, by a majority vote of the total membership of the board cast during its first regularly scheduled meeting of each calendar year, may authorize payment to its members of a stipend not to exceed sixty dollars ($60.00) per day for each meeting, examination, evaluation, or inspection attended or for any day while performing any proper business of the board, and the board members shall receive no other compensation, expense reimbursement, or in-lieu-of payments except as provided in §25-16-902:

Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques;

Arkansas Alcohol and Drug Abuse Coordinating Council;

Alcoholic Beverage Control Board;

Athletics and Activities Board;

Arkansas Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board;

Arkansas State Board of Architects, Landscape Architects, and Interior Designers;

Black History Commission of Arkansas;

Arkansas History Commission;

State Board of Barber Examiners;

[Repealed.]

State Board of Embalmers, Funeral Directors, Cemeteries, and Burial Services;

Capitol Zoning District Commission;

[Repealed.]

Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission;

Contractors Licensing Board;

Cosmetology Technical Advisory Committee;

State Crime Laboratory Board;

Board of Developmental Disabilities Services;

Arkansas Educational Television Commission;

Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas;

State Board of Election Commissioners;

Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council;

[Repealed.]

State Board of Licensure for Professional Engineers and Professional Surveyors;

State Library Board;

Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board;

Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board;

Arkansas State Board of Registration for Foresters;

HVACR Licensing Board;

Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board;

Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission;

Arkansas Board of Examiners in Counseling;

Massage Therapy Technical Advisory Committee;

Mississippi River Parkway Commission of Arkansas;

Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission;

Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission;

Arkansas State Occupational Therapy Examining Committee;

State Apprenticeship Committee;

Arkansas State Board of Physical Therapy;

Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians;

Advisory Committee on Petroleum Storage Tanks;

Arkansas Real Estate Commission;

Compliance Advisory Panel;

Board of Review;

Arkansas Rural Medical Practice Student Loan and Scholarship Board;

Arkansas Geological Survey;

Land Survey Advisory Board;

Arkansas Solid Waste Licensing Committee for the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board;

Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board;

Arkansas State Police Commission;

[Repealed.]

Arkansas Towing and Recovery Board;

Arkansas Veterans' Commission;

Veterinary Medical Examining Board;

Commission on Water Well Construction;

Arkansas Waterways Commission;

Committee of Plumbing Examiners;

Arkansas Waste Water Licensing Committee;

State Board of Collection Agencies;

Elevator Safety Board;

State Apprenticeship Coordination Steering Committee;

Arkansas Board of Hearing Instrument Dispensers;

Arkansas Tobacco Control Board;

Arkansas State Board of Athletic Training;

State Athletic Commission;

Daisy Gatson Bates Holiday Committee;

Amusement Ride Safety Advisory Board; and

Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage Advisory Committee.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The Athletics and Activities Board, referred to in (5), has not been created by any Code provision.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 137, provided:

“Transfer of the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department to the Arkansas Geographic Information System Office.

“(a)(1)The Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department is transferred to the Arkansas Geographic Information System Office by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)As used in this act, the Arkansas Geographic Information System Office is the principal department.

“(b)All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Arkansas Geographic Information System Office, except as specified by this act.

“(c)All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Board.

“(d)The members of the Advisory Board to the Division of Land Surveys, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the board except as specified in this act.

“(e)Except as specified in this act, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall replace ‘Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department’ with ‘Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Geographic Information Office’.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)The General Assembly finds:

“(1)State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment by No. 4 substituted “Cosmetology Technical Advisory Committee” for “State Board of Cosmetology” in (17).

The 2009 amendment by No. 404 inserted (71).

The 2009 amendment by No. 746 deleted (38).

The 2011 amendment by No. 786 deleted (44).

The 2011 amendment by No. 896 added (72).

The 2013 amendment repealed (1).

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Land Survey Advisory Board” for “Advisory Board to the Division of Land Surveys” in (47); and deleted “Arkansas” preceding “Building Authority Council” in (52).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 repealed (52).

The 2017 amendment by No. 540 repealed (10) and (23).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1067 substituted “Compliance Advisory Panel” for “State Marketing Board for Recyclables” in (43).

The 2019 amendment substituted “State Board of Embalmers, Funeral Directors, Cemeteries, and Burial Services” for “Burial Association Board” in (11); and repealed (13).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1211, § 3; 1997, No. 250, § 239; 1997, No. 377, § 1; 1997, No. 693, § 1; 1997, No. 697, § 1; 1997, No. 966, § 13; 1997, No. 1018, § 4; 1999, No. 1235, § 1; 1999, No. 1286, § 3; 1999, No. 1553, § 19; 1999, No. 1591, § 5; 2001, No. 1650, § 1; 2003, No. 1300, § 2; 2007, No. 67, § 1; 2007, No. 186, § 11; 2007, No. 1583, § 3; 2009, No. 4, § 27; 2009, No. 404 § 1; 2009, No. 746, § 1; 2011, No. 786, § 1; 2011, No. 896, § 4; 2013, No. 89, § 1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, §§ 60, 151; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, §§ 60, 151; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 84; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 84; 2017, No. 540, §§ 52, 53; 2017, No. 1067, § 10; 2019, No. 392, §§ 3, 4.

25-16-904. Stipend — Authorization for $85.

Each of the following state boards, by a majority vote of the total membership of the board cast during its first regularly scheduled meeting of each calendar year, may authorize payment to its members of a stipend not to exceed eighty-five dollars ($85.00) per day for each meeting, examination, evaluation, or inspection attended or for any day while performing any proper business of the board, and the board members shall receive no other compensation, expense reimbursement, or in-lieu-of payments except as provided in §25-16-902:

Auctioneer's Licensing Board;

Arkansas Economic Development Commission;

Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center;

Board of Corrections;

State Board of Education;

State Board of Embalmers, Funeral Directors, Cemeteries, and Burial Services;

State Board of Health;

Arkansas Health Policy Council;

State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission;

Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

Parole Board;

Arkansas Racing Commission;

Arkansas Sentencing Commission;

Career Education and Workforce Development Board;

Oil and Gas Commission;

Professional Bail Bond Company and Professional Bail Bondsman Licensing Board;

Arkansas Natural Resources Commission;

Red River Commission;

Board of Trustees of the Arkansas School for the Blind and the Arkansas School for the Deaf;

Board of Directors of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority;

[Repealed.]

Arkansas Social Work Licensing Board; and

[Repealed.]

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added (24) and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment by No. 521 added (25)[23].

The 2011 amendment by No. 808 deleted (3) and (11) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2017 amendment by No. 788 substituted “State Board of Embalmers, Funeral Directors, Cemeteries, and Burial Services” for “State Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors” in (6).

The 2017 amendment by No. 824 repealed (23).

The 2019 amendment repealed (21).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, No. 788, § 2: July 1, 2018.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1211, § 4; 1997, No. 540, § 51; 1997, No. 693, § 2; 1999, No. 1053, § 1; 1999, No. 1286, § 1; 2001, No. 726, § 1; 2001, No. 1650, § 2; 2001, No. 1803, § 6; 2007, No. 67, § 2; 2009, No. 261, § 5; 2011, No. 521, § 27; 2011, No. 808, §
1; 2017, No. 788, § 93; 2017, No. 824, § 16; 2019, No. 392, § 5.

25-16-905. Stipend — Authorization for $110.

Each of the following state boards, by a majority vote of the total membership of the board cast during its first regularly scheduled meeting of each calendar year, may authorize payment to its members of a stipend not to exceed one hundred ten dollars ($110) per day for each meeting, examination, evaluation, or inspection attended or for any day while performing any proper business of the board, and the board members shall not receive any other compensation, expense reimbursement, or in-lieu-of payments except as provided in §25-16-902:

Arkansas State Board of Dental Examiners;

Arkansas State Medical Board;

State Board of Optometry;

Sex Offender Assessment Committee;

Arkansas State Board of Chiropractic Examiners;

Arkansas State Board of Nursing;

Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy;

Arkansas Board of Podiatric Medicine; and

Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment by No. 746 substituted “Offender” for “Offenders” in (4), added (8), and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1484 deleted (6) and redesignated the subsequent subdivision accordingly, and made a related change.

The 2011 amendment by No. 786 added (8).

The 2011 amendment by No. 808 deleted former (6), redesignated former (7) as present (6), and added present (7).

The 2013 amendment added (9).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1211, § 5; 1999, No. 492, § 1; 1999, No. 1053, § 2; 1999, No. 1353, § 16; 1999, No. 1553, § 18; 2001, No. 1601, § 10; 2001, No. 1650, § 3; 2007, No. 67, § 3; 2009, No. 746, § 2; 2009, No. 1484, § 10; 2011, No. 786, § 2; 2011, No. 808, §
2; 2013, No. 89, § 2.

25-16-906. Stipend — State employees — Salaried members — Members of General Assembly.

No state employee shall receive any stipend under this subchapter.

Those persons who are paid a salary for serving as a member of a state board shall continue to receive the salary and shall receive no stipend under this subchapter.

State board members who are also members of the General Assembly shall continue to receive mileage, expense reimbursement, and per diem as prescribed for legislators attending meetings of interim committees of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1211, § 6; 1997, No. 1354, § 42.